New Jersey, session 221, A1357.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Within six months of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the New Jersey Transit Corporation shall provide onboard Wi-Fi service on each rail passenger vehicle that is owned or operated by the corporation. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.